11724/HW2/try.foma
define Voiceless [p|t];
define Devoicing z -> s || Voiceless _ .#.;
read regex Devoicing;
apply down pz

define Devoicing ɖ -> ʐ || Vowel _ Vowel;
define Devoicing g -> ɣ || Vowel _ Vowel;
define VowelInsertion [] -> i || i C _ C C;
define VowelInsertion [] -> u || u C _ C C;


define lt_changeto_ʃ lt -> ʃ;

read regex VowelInsertion .o. Devoicing .o. lt_changeto_ʃ .o. M_changeto_N .o. t-Deletion;

read regex VowelInsertion .o. Devoicing .o. M_changeto_N .o. t-Deletion;



apply down gaʕmta
apply down laamta
apply down laamo
apply down simo
apply down d⁀ʒid
apply down bagl
apply down jirdta
apply down kefedta
apply down boholta
apply down baɣalta
apply down naago
apply down ʔulta
apply down hadaltaj
apply down sabo
apply down feeɖo
apply down gabɖta
apply down sugaj
apply down sidtaj
apply down irbadta
apply down qosoltaj
apply up gaʕanta
apply up laanta
apply up laamo
apply up simo
apply up d⁀ʒid
apply up baɣal
apply up jirida
apply up kefeda
apply up bohoʃa
apply up baɣaʃa
apply up naaɣo
apply up ʔuʃa
apply up haðaʃaj
apply up saβo
apply up feeʐo
apply up gaβaɖa
apply up suɣaj
apply up sidaj
apply up irbada
apply up qosoʃaj
